Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-909
Final judgment; effect.

Final judgment in any suit under the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act and sections 16-727, 16-728, 23-175, 39-809, and 79-610 shall constitute a complete bar to any action by the claimant, by reason of the same subject matter, against the employee of the political subdivision whose act or omission gave rise to the claim, but this section shall not apply if the court rules that the claim is not permitted under such act and sections.

Laws 1969, c. 138, § 8, p. 629;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2408;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1024.

Dismissal of claim against employee was correct after final judgment in suit under this act. Craig v. Gage County, 190 Neb. 320, 208 N.W.2d 82 (1973).